Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.40.130

Record of voters issued a ballot and voters who returned a ballot—Public access.

Each county auditor shall maintain in his or her office, open for public inspection, a record of all voters issued a ballot and all voters who returned a ballot. For each primary, special election, or general election, any political party, committee, or person may request a list of all registered voters who have or have not voted. Such requests shall be handled as public records requests pursuant to chapter 42.56 RCW.

[ 2011 c 10 s 42; 2003 c 111 s 1013. Prior: 1991 c 81 s 33; 1987 c 346 s 17; 1973 1st ex.s. c 61 s 1. Formerly RCW 29.36.340, 29.36.097.]

NOTES:

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.

Effective date—1991 c 81: See note following RCW 29A.84.540.

Legislative intent—Effective date—1987 c 346: See notes following RCW 29A.40.010.